Nebraska statutes.
Reissue Revised Statutes of Nebraska15-234
Hospital; rules; management.

There shall be established such rules for the government of such hospital and admission of persons to its privileges as may be deemed expedient. No religious or sectarian association, organization or body shall be permitted to manage or control such hospital.

Laws 1901, c. 16, § 129, XXXV, p. 136;

R.S.1913, § 4445;

C.S.1922, § 3829;

C.S.1929, § 15-232;

R.S.1943, § 15-234;

Laws 1963, c. 55, p 1, p. 235.